Utah statutes.
63M-11-102.   Creation -- Purpose.
(1)  In accordance with this chapter, there is created within the governor's
office the Utah Commission on Aging.
(2)  The commission's purpose is to:
(a)  increase public and government understanding of the current and future
needs of the state's aging population and how those needs may be most
effectively and efficiently met;
(b)  study, evaluate, and report on the projected impact that the state's
increasing aging population will have on:
(i)  government services;
(ii)  health services;
(iii)  social services;
(iv)  the economy; and
(v)  society in general;
(c)  identify and recommend implementation of specific policies, procedures,
and programs to respond to the needs and impact of the aging population
relating to:
(i)  government services;
(ii)  health services;
(iii)  social services;
(iv)  the economy; and
(v)  society in general;
(d)  facilitate coordination of the functions of public and private entities
concerned with the aging population; and
(e)  accomplish the duties enumerated in Section 63M-11-203.
